Washington statutes.
RCW 35.91.015

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Latecomer fee" means a charge collected by a municipality, whether separately stated or as part of a connection fee for providing access to a municipal system, against a real property owner who connects to or uses a water or sewer facility subject to a contract created under RCW 35.91.020.

(2) "Municipality" means the governing body of any county, city, town, or drainage district.

(3) "Water or sewer facilities" means storm, sanitary, or combination sewers, pumping stations, and disposal plants, water mains, hydrants, reservoirs, or appurtenances.

[ 2013 c 243 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 243 ss 2 and 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2014." [ 2013 c 243 s 5.]